California, session 20252026, AB1770.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12529.9 is added to the Government Code, to read:12529.9. (a) The Attorney General shall have oversight over, and may require reports from, health care service plans to ensure that health care service plans plan contracts that include a term requiring the parties to submit to binding arbitration to settle disputes comply with the requirements set forth in Section 1363.1 and Sections 1373.19 to 1373.21, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, an arbitration claim initiated pursuant to a health care service plan shall be conducted pursuant to Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) and Title 9.1 (commencing with Section 1295) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(c) The authority of the Attorney General to act based on the oversight granted under subdivision (a), including investigating and prosecuting violations of state unfair competition laws or any other state law, is not narrowed, abrogated, or otherwise altered by this section or any other law.(d) The authority of the Department of Managed Health Care to act under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, including Section 1363.1 and Sections 1373.19 to 1373.21, inclusive, is not narrowed, abrogated, or otherwise altered by this section.